Utah statutes.
54-1-1.   Establishment of commission -- Functions.

The Public Service Commission of Utah is established as an independent agency. The Public Service Commission is charged with discharging the duties and exercising the legislative, adjudicative, and rule-making powers committed to it by law and may sue and be sued in its own name.



Amended by Chapter 246, 1983 General Session

